Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2939
Legislative findings; department; powers.

The Legislature finds and declares it is the policy of this state that animal health and disease control are essential to the livestock industry and the health of the economy of Nebraska. The purpose of the Animal Health and Disease Control Act is to further the best interests of Nebraska's livestock industry and to grow Nebraska agriculture. In carrying out its duty to protect the health of Nebraska's livestock, the department may use USDA/APHIS/VS program standards to determine and employ the most efficient and practical means for the prevention, suppression, control, and eradication of dangerous diseases among livestock and transmissible from other animals to livestock.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 39.